Utah statutes.
20A-5-410.   Study voting by mail.

(1)  The lieutenant governor, in consultation with other election officers, shall study how to administer an election that takes place no later than 2015 in which all registered voters receive a ballot in the mail and a person may vote by:

(a)  returning a marked ballot to the election officer in the mail; or

(b)  marking a ballot in person at an early voting polling place or an election day voting center.

(2) (a)  An election officer shall participate in the study at the request of the lieutenant governor.

(b)  The study shall include recommended statutory changes.

(3)  The lieutenant governor shall report on the progress of the study to the Government Operations Interim Committee before September 30, 2012, September 30, 2013, and September 30, 2014.

